Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.210

Order of confirmation is conclusive.

If the report of the referee be confirmed, the order of confirmation is binding and conclusive upon all parties to the suit, and upon the lien creditors who have been duly served with the notice to appear before the referee, as provided in RCW 7.52.180.

[Code 1881 s 572; 1877 p 120 s 575; 1869 p 137 s 525; RRS s 858.]